Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FAITH'S LAW.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education for the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Public access automated external defibrillator smart monitored cabinets. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the Minnesota State High School League for school districts to purchase, install, and operate public access automated external defibrillator (AED) smart monitored cabinets on school grounds: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin $24,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) Grant money must be used to purchase and install up to 2,000 public access AED smart monitored cabinets, including fully connected AEDs with quick rescue, five years of AED smart monitoring and full maintenance, and miscellaneous accessories and actions in an AED package program supplied by Power to Save a Life, Advocates for Health, AED Smart Monitoring LLC, Avive Real Connect AED, or their equivalents. The AED units must be installed on school grounds and comply with public access AEDs as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 403.51, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) The Minnesota State High School League and the Anyone Can Save A Life program must mutually select school districts as grant award recipients from applicants that agree to the following: new text end new text begin (1) each AED unit purchased with grant money must be located outdoors or in an indoor facility that is always publicly accessible; new text end new text begin (2) the local, state, or federal agency that administers the land on which the AED unit is located must agree to the specific location where it is placed; new text end new text begin (3) the grant recipient must provide for the operation and maintenance of the AED unit for five years from installation without seeking additional state or local funding; new text end new text begin (4) the grant recipient must install, operate, and maintain the AED unit in a manner that accounts for typical weather and temperature conditions and ensures reliable operation in those conditions; and new text end new text begin (5) the grant recipient is responsible for compliance with the applicable requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 403.51. new text end new text begin (d) By October 1, 2025, the Minnesota State High School League and the Anyone Can Save A Life program must begin accepting school district applications for installation of AED smart monitored cabinets on school district grounds and determine the per district allocation of grant money. new text end new text begin (e) By October 1, 2026, the Minnesota State High School League must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education on the grants awarded to school districts, money allocated to each recipient district, and number of AED units installed. The report must be filed in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195. new text end new text begin (f) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end